src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON xnen_common_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:se^WG%> t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:s%>itte n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:s%>te n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:s%>i^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:shii n_PxK ;    !
 +Pl+Ine:s^WG%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:s%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:s%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:s%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:si TRA ;


LEXICON 3cases
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Ade:%>ll^A PxK ;
+All:%>lle PxxK ;
+Ess:%>nn^A PxK ;
+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;
!+Ess+Err/Orth:%>n^A PxK ;

LEXICON 2cases
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Ade:%>l^A PxK ;
+All:%>le PxxK ;
+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;
+Ess:%>nn^A PxK ;

LEXICON 3n_ks
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: xn_ks ;
+N+Sg+Nom:^WGs R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WGkse%>n R ;

LEXICON 3n_ks_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: xn_ks_pl ;

LEXICON xn_ks
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
xn_ks_sg ;
xn_ks_pl ;

LEXICON xn_ks_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom: st_PxK ; 
 +Sg+Gen:kse%> n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:s%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:kse^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:kse%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:kse%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:kse%>lle PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:kse%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:kse%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:kse%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:kse%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:kse TRA ;


LEXICON xn_ks_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:kse%> t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:s%>te n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:kse%>i2^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Par+Err/Orth:kse%>i2tten PxK ; !CHECK EK
 +Pl+Ine:ks%>iss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:kse^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:ks%>ist^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:ks%>i2lle PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:ks%>ill^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:ks%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:ks%>in^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:ks%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:ks%>i2 TRA ;


LEXICON n_äes !!identical to n_ks except N+Sg+Nom 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: x_äes ;
+N+Sg+Nom:^WGs R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WGkse%>n R ;

LEXICON x_äes !!xn_ks except N+Sg+Nom 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:^WG s_PxK ; 
 +Sg+Gen:kse%> n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:s%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:kse^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:kse%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:kse%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:kse%>lle PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:kse%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:kse%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:kse%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:kse%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:kse TRA ;

 +Pl+Nom:kse%> t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:s%>te n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:kse%>i2^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:ks%>iss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:kse^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:ks%>ist^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:ks%>i2lle PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:ks%>ill^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:ks%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:ks%>in^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:ks%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:ks%>i2 TRA ;


LEXICON 3n_ue
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
3x_ue ;
+N+Sg+Nom:s R ;
N+Sg+Gen:e%>n R ;
+N+Sg+Nom:de%>n R ;

LEXICON 3x_ue
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: 3x_ue_sg ;
+N: 3x_ue_pl ;

LEXICON 3x_ue_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom: st_PxK ;
 +Sg+Gen:e%> n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:t%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:t%>hee n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:e%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine+Err/Orth:ve%>ss^A PxK ; 
 +Sg+Ela:e%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:e%>lle PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:e%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:e%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:e%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:te%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:e TRA ;

LEXICON 3x_ue_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:e%> t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:ks%>i2e n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:ks%>i2^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:ks%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:ks%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:ks%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:ks%>i2lle PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:ks%>i2ll^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:ks%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:ks%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:ks%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:ksi TRA ;

LEXICON 3n_ime
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Sg+Nom:^WGn       R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:me%>n R ;
  3n_ime_sg ;
  3n_ime_pl ;

LEXICON 3n_ime_sg 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: x_ime_sg ;

LEXICON 3n_ime_pl 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N: x_ime_pl ;

LEXICON x_ime_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:^WG n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Gen:me%> n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:^WGn%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:m%>hee n_PxK ; !kirjaimheen
 +Sg+Ill:me^HMET2%>hee n_PxK ; !kirjaimheen
 +Sg+Ine:me%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:me%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:me%>lle PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:me%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:me%>ll^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:me%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:me%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:me TRA ;

LEXICON x_ime_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:me%> t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:n%>te n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:m%>i^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:m%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:mi^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ; !kirjaihmiin
 +Pl+Ine:m%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:m%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:m%>i2lle PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:m%>i2ll^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:m%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:m%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:m%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:mi2 TRA ;

LEXICON nas ! tehas
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N: xnas ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:^WGs R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>^Vn R ;

LEXICON xnas
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 xnas_sg ;
 xnas_pl ;

LEXICON xnas_sg ! ankerias:ankeria
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:^WG a_PxK ;
 +Sg+Gen:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ; !salmhaan
 +Sg+Gen:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ; !salhmaan
 +Sg+Par:^WGs%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^Vshee n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^Vshee n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:^HMETA%>h^V^Vss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:^HMET2%>h^V^Vss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:^HMETA%>h^V^Vst^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:^HMET2%>h^V^Vst^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:^HMETA%>h^V^Vle PxxK ;
 +Sg+All:^HMET2%>h^V^Vle PxxK ; !maitosalhmaala
 +Sg+Ade:^HMETA%>h^V^Vl^A PxK ; !maitosalmhaala
 +Sg+Ade:^HMET2%>h^V^Vl^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:^HMETA%>h^V^Vlt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:^HMET2%>h^V^Vlt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:^HMETA%>h^V^Vtt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:^HMET2%>h^V^Vtt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:^HMET2%>h^V^Vn^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:^HMETA%>h^V^V TRA ;
 +Sg+Tra:^HMET2%>h^V^V TRA ;

LEXICON xnas_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:^HMETA%>h^V^V t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^HMETA%>h^Vitte n_PxK ; !maitosalmhoitten !TEST
 +Pl+Gen:^HMET2%>h^Vitte n_PxK ; !maitosalhmoitten
 +Pl+Par:^HMETA%>h^Vit^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:^HMET2%>h^Vit^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^Vi n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:^HMETA%>h^Viss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:^HMET2%>h^Viss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:^HMETA%>h^Vist^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:^HMET2%>h^Vist^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:^HMETA%>h^Vile PxxK ;
 +Pl+All:^HMET2%>h^Vile PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^HMETA%>h^Vil^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^HMET2%>h^Vil^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^HMETA%>h^Vilt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^HMET2%>h^Vilt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:^HMETA%>h^Vin^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:^HMET2%>h^Vin^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:^HMETA%>h^Vi TRA ;
 +Pl+Tra:^HMET2%>h^Vi TRA ;
 +Pl+Abe:^HMETA%>h^Vitt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:^HMET2%>h^Vitt^A PxK ;

 LEXICON nas_h ! saappas !CHECK EK ser rätt ut? 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 nas_h_sg ;
 nas_h_pl ;
 
 LEXICON nas_h_sg ! saaphaat !CHECK EK
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N: xnas_sg ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:^WGs R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>^Vn R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:^HMETA%>h^V^V t_PxK ;

LEXICON nas_h_pl ! saaphaat !CHECK EK
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N: xnas_pl ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:^HMETA%>h^V^V t_PxK ;
 


LEXICON 3mies
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Sg+Nom:sh_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:he%> n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:s%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:hhe%>e n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:he%>ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:he%>st^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:he%>le PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:he%>l^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:he%>lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:he%>tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:he%>n^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:he TRA ;

 +N+Pl+Nom:he%> t_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:h%>ie n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ste n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:h%>itte n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:h%>i^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:hhii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:he%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:he%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:he%>i2le PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:he%>i2l^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:he%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:he%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:he%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra:he TRA ;

LEXICON n_ien
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 n_ien_sg ;
 n_ien_pl ;

LEXICON n_ien_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Sg+Nom:^WG n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ne%> n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:^WGn%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:n^HMETA%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:hnee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:ne%>ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:ne%>st^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:ne%>lle PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:ne%>ll^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:ne%>lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:ne%>tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:ne%>nn^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:he TRA ;
