src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
kiertokauppias:kiertokauppia nas ;
kotapieljas:kotapielja nas ;
ottikas:ottikka nas ;
nutukas:nutukka nas ;
kuningas:kuninka nas ;
sapilas:sapila nas ;
vuolas:vuola nas ;
viiminenhammas:viiminen#hampa nas ;
nurmituomas:nurmi#tuoma nas ;
saapas:saappa nas_h ;
nahkasaapas:nahka#saappa nas_h;
kumakkasaapas:kumakka#saappa nas_h;
flinttasaapas:flintta#saappa nas_h;
plankkisaapas:plankki#saappa nas_h;
kleninkisaapas:kleninki#saappa nas_h;
puolisaapas:puoli#saappa nas_h;
koipisaapas:koipi#saappa nas_h;
filttisaapas:filtti#saappa nas_h;
mustankengänsaapas:mustankengän#saappa nas_h;
kalttosaapas:kaltto#saappa nas_h;
pieksusaapas:pieksu#saappa nas_h;
klosusaapas:klosu#saappa nas_h;
illanvalpas:illan#valppa nas ;
navettavaras:navetta#vara nas ;
oras:ora nas ;
kengänparras:kengän#parta nas ;
ratas:ratta nas ;
keskitaivas:keski#taiva nas ;
lekamies:leka#mie 3mies ;
virkamies:virka#mie 3mies ;
tuohustamamies:tuohustama#mie 3mies ;
viinamies:viina#mie 3mies ;
nuottamies:nuotta#mie 3mies ;
tiemies:tie#mie 3mies ;
velimies:veli#mie 3mies ;
komeetimies:komeeti#mie 3mies ;
suittimies:suitti#mie 3mies ;
kymmenmies:kymmen#mie 3mies ;
salkomies:salko#mie 3mies ;
latomies:lato#mie 3mies ;
nimismies:nimis#mie 3mies ;
kulutusmies:kulutus#mie 3mies ;
laskumies:lasku#mie 3mies ;
väymies:väy#mie 3mies ;
nyttämämies:nyttämä#mie 3mies ;
päämies:pää#mie 3mies ;
äes:äke n_äes ;
ien:ike n_ien ;
piilukirves:piilu#kirve nas ;
maitovaain:maitovaai 3n_ime ;
kielain:kielai 3n_ime ;
kuolaimet:kuolai 3n_ime_pl ;
sain:sai 3n_ime ;
jäänhalkein:jäänhalkei 3n_ime ;
kiehin:kiehi 3n_ime ;
ohin:ohi 3n_ime ;
laijin:laiji 3n_ime ;
paskahärkin:paskahärkki 3n_ime ;
polkimet:polki 3n_ime_pl ;
yin:yki 3n_ime ;
puhelin:puheli 3n_ime ;
kielenkannin:kielenkanni 3n_ime ;
kiimajänis:kiima#jäni 3n_ks ;
tarvoin:tarvoi 3n_ime ;
purasin:purasi 3n_ime ;
uistin:uisti 3n_ime ;
karatin:karatti 3n_ime ;
istuin:istui 3n_ime ;
morsian:morsia 3n_ime ;
hakos:hako 3n_ks ;
painos:paino 3n_ks ;
piskaskeitos:piskaskeito 3n_ks ;
leivos:leivo 3n_ks ;
diabeetes:diabeete 3n_ks ;
jouttiäes:jouttiäke n_äes ;
piäs:piä nas ;
karamätäs:kara#mättä nas ;
vuosisaaphaat:vuosisaappa nas_h_pl ;
vareksensaaphaat:vareksensaappa nas_h_pl ;
variksensaaphaat:variksensaappa nas_h_pl ;
ostohamphaat:osto#hampoa nas_h_pl ;
koskelohamphaat:koskelohamppa nas_h_pl ;
vuosikinthaat:vuosikintta nas_h_pl ;
ohjakset:ohja 3n_ks_pl ;
juomakset:juoma 3n_ks_pl ;
viinakset:viina 3n_ks_pl ;
luuakset:luua 3n_ks_pl ;
luuvakset:luuva 3n_ks_pl ;
viikset:vii 3n_ks_pl ;
naokset:nao 3n_ks_pl ;
langokset:lango 3n_ks_pl ;
makaukset:makau 3n_ks_pl ;
makkaukset:makkau 3n_ks_pl ;
liemenhiukset:liemenhiu 3n_ks_pl ;
toukukset:touku 3n_ks_pl ;
tulukset:tulu 3n_ks_pl ;
etuuimukset:etuuimu 3n_ks_pl ;
rukoukset:rukou 3n_ks_pl ;
kapistukset:kapistu 3n_ks_pl ;
liikutukset:liikutu 3n_ks_pl ;
makkuukset:makkuu 3n_ks_pl ;
rukkuukset:rukkuu 3n_ks_pl ;
tuttavukset:tuttavu 3n_ks_pl ;
jälkimykset:jälkimy 3n_ks_pl ;
ystävykset:ystävy 3n_ks_pl ;
uimaeväkset:uimaevä 3n_ks_pl ;
kaihtimet:kaihti 3n_ime_pl ;
hohtimet:hohti 3n_ime_pl ;
pohtimet:pohti 3n_ime_pl ;
kerittimet:keritti 3n_ime_pl ;
taphaus:taphau 3n_ks ;
merkkaus:merkkau 3n_ks ;
luppaus:luppau 3n_ks ;
arvaus:arvau 3n_ks ;
fariseeus:fariseeu 3n_ue ;
kuolheus:kuolheu 3n_ue ;
katheus:katheu 3n_ue ;
mielihaikeus:mielihaikeu 3n_ue ;
käräjäoikeus:käräjäoikeu 3n_ue ;
falskeus:falskeu 3n_ue ;
umpeus:umpeu 3n_ue ;
lauveus:lauveu 3n_ue ;
lohmus:lohmu 3n_ks ;
rukkous:rukkou 3n_ks ;
maatallous:maa#tallou 3n_ue ;
porojajovantus:porojajovantu 3n_ks ;
ilfheys:ilfhey 3n_ue ;
nyrheys:nyrhey 3n_ue ;
fiineys:fiiney 3n_ue ;
lempeys:lempey 3n_ue ;
virreys:virrey 3n_ue ;
leveys:levey 3n_ue ;
fiiniys:fiiniy 3n_ue ;
sängynpäälys:sängynpääly 3n_ks ;
myrkytys:myrkyty 3n_ks ;
kläpshäys:kläpshäy 3n_ks ;
syän:syä 3n_ime ; ! xxx sjekk
sauvon:sauvo 3n_ime ;
sekkainus:sekkainu 3n_ks ;
seittemänvuotias:seittemänvuotia nas ;
jaakaamamies:jaakaamamie 3mies ;
jakoavain:jako#avai 3n_ime ;
heikous:heikou 3n_ue ;
hoksattimet:hoksatti 3n_ime_pl ;
hönkkäys:hönkkäy 3n_ks ;
huopasaapas:huopasaappa nas_h ;
fästivieras:fästi#viera nas ;
aatelismies:aatelismie 3mies ;
auvain:auvai 3n_ime ;
kriisikokkous:kriisi#kokkou 3n_ks ;
ykseys:yksey 3n_ue ;
yläruumis:yläruumi nas ;
pyöhräys:pyöhräy 3n_ks ;
pappismies:pappismie 3mies ;
likheys:likhey 3n_ue ;
löysihammas:löysihampa nas ;
rinnus:rinnu 3n_ks ;
reijitin:reijiti 3n_ime ;
riukuvarsisaapas:riukuvarsi#saappa nas_h ;
rahtimies:rahtimie 3mies ;
vihkisormus:vihkisormu 3n_ks ;
viileys:viiley 3n_ue ;
kolmiyhtheys:kolmi#yhthey 3n_ue ;
kelles:kelle 3n_ks ;
kuolain:kuolai 3n_ime ;
erheys:erhey 3n_ue ;
